Missouri, session 2026, HB3333.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.1117, to read as follows:
407.1117. 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context provides otherwise,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Digital services", any service provided via the internet or an electronic
network that is delivered to the consumer through the use of electronic devices;
(2) "Electronic device", any cell phone, smart phone, or tablet used by
consumers connected to a wireless telephone service;
(3) "Mobile application", third-party software developed specifically for use on
electronic devices.
2. Any provider of a mobile application on an electronic device connected to a
wireless telephone service that uses a subscription model that relies on automatic
renewal or continuous service on its mobile application shall provide its customers an
option to cancel such subscription service through such mobile application.
3. Any mobile application that provides a subscription model that relies on
automatic renewal shall post in a clear and conspicuous format a direct link or button
where a consumer can terminate the automatic renewal subscription model.
4. A violation of this section constitutes a violation of the Missouri
Merchandising Practices Act, sections 407.005 to 407.145.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3333 2
5. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this section and shall
bring necessary actions for violations of this section. The attorney general shall have the
authority to promulgate all rules necessary for the administration and enforcement of
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔